California statutes. Civil Code
(a) A homeowner shall be offered a rental agreement for (1) a term of 12 months, or (2) a lesser period as the homeowner may request, or (3) a longer period as mutually agreed upon by both the homeowner and management.

(b) No rental agreement shall contain any terms or conditions with respect to charges for rent, utilities, or incidental reasonable service charges that would be different during the first 12 months of the rental agreement from the corresponding terms or
 conditions that would be offered to the homeowners on a month-to-month basis.

(c) No rental agreement for a term of 12 months or less shall include any provision which authorizes automatic extension or renewal of, or automatically extends or renews, the rental agreement beyond the initial term for a term longer than 12 months at the sole option of either the management or the homeowner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 289, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

798.19.

No rental agreement for a mobilehome shall contain a provision by which the homeowner waives his or her rights under the provisions of Articles 1 to 8, inclusive, of this chapter. Any such waiver shall be deemed contrary to public policy and void.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1397, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

798.19.5.

A rental agreement entered into or renewed on and after January 1, 2006, shall not include a clause, rule, regulation, or any other provision that grants to management the right of first refusal to purchase a homeowner’s mobilehome that is in the park and offered for sale to a third party pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 798.70). This section does not preclude a separate agreement for separate consideration granting the park owner or management a right of first refusal to purchase the homeowner’s mobilehome that is in the park and offered for
 sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 35, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

798.20.

(a) Membership in any private club or organization that is a condition for tenancy in a park shall not be denied on any basis listed in subdivision (a) or (d) of Section 12955 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926, 12926.1, subdivision (m) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 12955, and Section 12955.2 of the Government Code.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), with respect to familial status, subdivision (a) shall not be construed to apply to housing for older persons, as defined in Section 12955.9 of the Government Code. With respect to familial status, nothing in subdivision (a) shall be construed to affect Sections 51.2, 51.3, 51.4, 51.10, 51.11, and 799.5, relating to housing for senior citizens. Subdivision (d) of Section 51 and Section 4760 of this code and subdivisions (n), (o), and (p) of Section 12955 of the Government Code shall apply to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 26.   (AB 806)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 86 of Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

798.21.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 798.17, if a mobilehome space within a mobilehome park is not the principal residence of the homeowner and the homeowner has not rented the mobilehome to another party, it shall be exempt from any ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure adopted by any city, county, or city and county, which establishes a maximum amount that the landlord may charge a tenant for rent.

(b) Nothing in this section is intended to require any homeowner to
 disclose information concerning his or her personal finances. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize management to gain access to any records which would otherwise be confidential or privileged.

(c) For purposes of this section, a mobilehome shall be deemed to be the principal residence of the homeowner, unless a review of state or county records demonstrates that the homeowner is receiving a homeowner’s exemption for another property or mobilehome in this state, or unless a review of public records reasonably demonstrates that the principal residence of the homeowner is out of state.

(d) Before modifying the rent or other terms of tenancy as a result of a review of records, as described in subdivision (c), the management shall notify the homeowner, in writing, of the proposed changes and provide the homeowner with a copy of the documents upon which management
 relied.

(e) The homeowner shall have 90 days from the date the notice described in subdivision (d) is mailed to review and respond to the notice. Management may not modify the rent or other terms of tenancy prior to the expiration of the 90-day period or prior to responding, in writing, to information provided by the homeowner. Management may not modify the rent or other terms of tenancy if the homeowner provides documentation reasonably establishing that the information provided by management is incorrect or that the homeowner is not the same person identified in the documents. However, nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to authorize the homeowner to change the homeowner’s exemption status of the other property or mobilehome owned by the homeowner.

(f) This section does not apply under any of the following conditions:

(1) The homeowner is unable to rent or lease the mobilehome because the owner or management of the mobilehome park in which the mobilehome is located does not permit, or the rental agreement limits or prohibits, the assignment of the mobilehome or the subletting of the park space.

(2) The mobilehome is being actively held available for sale by the homeowner, or pursuant to a listing agreement with a real estate broker licensed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10130) of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code, or a mobilehome dealer, as defined in Section 18002.6 of the Health and Safety Code. A homeowner, real estate broker, or mobilehome dealer attempting to sell a mobilehome shall actively market and advertise the mobilehome for sale in good faith to bona fide purchasers for value in order to remain exempt pursuant to this subdivision. 

(3) The legal owner has taken possession or ownership, or both, of the mobilehome from a registered owner through either a surrender of ownership interest by the registered owner or a foreclosure proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 132, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

798.22.

(a) In any new mobilehome park that is developed after January 1, 1982, mobilehome spaces shall not be rented for the accommodation of recreational vehicles as defined by Section 799.29 unless the mobilehome park has a specifically designated area within the park for recreational vehicles, which is separate and apart from the area designated for mobilehomes. Recreational vehicles may be located only in the specifically designated area.

(b) Any new mobilehome park that is
 developed after January 1, 1982, is not subject to the provisions of this section until 75 percent of the spaces have been rented for the first time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 666, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Rules and Regulations [798.23. - 798.29.6.]

798.23.

(a) Management shall be subject to, and comply with, all park rules and regulations to the same extent as residents and their guests.

(b) Subdivision (a) of this section does not apply to either of the following:

(1) Any rule or regulation that governs the age of any resident or guest.

(2) Acts of management that are undertaken to fulfill management’s maintenance, management, and business operation responsibilities.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding
 subdivision (b) and subject to paragraph (2), management shall be subject to, and comply with, all rules and regulations that prohibit a homeowner from renting or subleasing the homeowner’s mobilehome or mobilehome space.

(2) (A) If a rule or regulation has been enacted that prohibits either renting or subleasing by a homeowner, management shall not directly rent a mobilehome except as follows:

(i) Management may directly rent up to two mobilehomes within the park for the purpose of housing onsite employees.

(ii) For every 200 mobilehomes in a park, the management may directly rent one more mobilehome within the park, in addition to the mobilehomes authorized for direct rental pursuant to clause
 (i), for the purpose of housing onsite employees.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “the purpose of housing onsite employees” includes directly renting a mobilehome to a person who is not an onsite employee to avoid a vacancy during times when the mobilehome is authorized for direct rental pursuant to subparagraph (A) and not needed for housing onsite employees.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), management may continue to directly rent a mobilehome to a tenant if both of the following apply:

(1) The tenancy was initially established by a rental agreement executed before January 1, 2022.

(2) A tenant listed on the rental agreement described in paragraph
 (1) continues to occupy the mobilehome.

(e) (1) A park shall be exempt from the provisions of subdivision (c) if either of the following apply:

(A) The park is owned and operated by an organization that qualifies as an exempt organization under Section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, and the property has been granted an exemption from property taxation pursuant to Section 214 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(B) The park is owned by a government agency or an entity controlled by a government agency, and has an affordability covenant in place.

(2) The exemption contained in paragraph (1) applies only to those mobilehomes
 or mobilehome sites within a park that are restricted for use as affordable housing pursuant to either a written regulatory agreement or the policy or practice of the exempt organization or government agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.   (AB 861)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

798.23.5.

(a) (1) Management shall permit a homeowner to rent his or her home that serves as the homeowner’s primary residence or sublet his or her space, under the circumstances described in paragraph (2) and subject to the requirements of this section.

(2) A homeowner shall be permitted to rent or sublet pursuant to
 paragraph (1) if a medical emergency or medical treatment requires the homeowner to be absent from his or her home and this is confirmed in writing by an attending physician.

(b) The following provisions shall apply to a rental or sublease pursuant to this section:

(1) The minimum term of the rental or sublease shall be six months, unless the management approves a shorter term, but no greater than 12 months, unless management approves a longer term.

(2) The management may require approval of a prospective renter or sublessee, subject to the process and restrictions provided by subdivision (a) of Section 798.74 for prospective purchasers of mobilehomes. A prospective sublessee shall comply with any rule or regulation limiting residency based on age requirements, pursuant to Section 798.76. The management may charge a
 prospective sublessee a credit screening fee for the actual cost of any personal reference check or consumer credit report that is provided by a consumer credit reporting agency, as defined in Section 1785.3, if the management or his or her agent requires that personal reference check or consumer credit report.

(3) The renter or sublessee shall comply with all rules and regulations of the park. The failure of a renter or sublessee to comply with the rules and regulations of the park may result in the termination of the homeowner’s tenancy in the mobilehome park, in accordance with Section 798.56. A homeowner’s tenancy may not be terminated under this paragraph if the homeowner completes an action for unlawful detainer or executes a judgment for possession, pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1159) of Title 3 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure within 60 days of the homeowner receiving notice of termination of tenancy.

(4) The homeowner shall remain liable for the mobilehome park rent and other park charges.

(5) The management may require the homeowner to reside in the mobilehome park for a term of one year before management permits the renting or subletting of a mobilehome or mobilehome space.

(6) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 798.39, if a security deposit has been refunded to the homeowner pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 798.39, the management may require the homeowner to resubmit a security deposit in an amount or value not to exceed two months’ rent in addition to the first month’s rent. Management may retain this security deposit for the duration of the term of the rental or sublease.

(7) The homeowner shall keep his or her current address
 and telephone number on file with the management during the term of rental or sublease. If applicable, the homeowner may provide the name, address, and telephone number of his or her legal representative.

(c) A homeowner may not charge a renter or sublessee more than an amount necessary to cover the cost of space rent, utilities, and scheduled loan payments on the mobilehome, if any.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 32.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

798.24.

Each common area facility shall be open or available to residents at all reasonable hours and the hours of the common area facility shall be posted at the facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 83, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

798.25.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (d), when the management proposes an amendment to the park’s rules and regulations, the management shall meet and consult with the homeowners in the park, their representatives, or both, after written notice has been given to all the homeowners in the park 10 days or more before the meeting. The notice shall set forth the proposed amendment to the park’s rules and regulations and shall state the date, time, and location of the meeting.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (d) following the meeting and consultation with the homeowners, the noticed amendment to the park’s rules and regulations may be implemented, as to any homeowner, with the consent of that homeowner, or without the homeowner’s consent upon written notice of not less than six months, except for regulations applicable to recreational facilities, which may be amended without homeowner consent upon written notice of not less than 60 days.

(c) Written notice to a homeowner whose tenancy commences within the required period of notice of a proposed amendment to the park’s rules and regulations under subdivision (b) or (d) shall constitute compliance with this section where the written notice is given before the inception of the tenancy.

(d) When the management proposes an amendment to the park’s rules and regulations mandated by a change
 in the law, including, but not limited to, a change in a statute, ordinance, or governmental regulation, the management may implement the amendment to the park’s rules and regulations, as to any homeowner, with the consent of that homeowner or without the homeowner’s consent upon written notice of not less than 60 days. For purposes of this subdivision, the management shall specify in the notice the citation to the statute, ordinance, or regulation, including the section number, that necessitates the proposed amendment to the park’s rules and regulations.

(e) Any amendment to the park’s rules and regulations that creates a new fee payable by the homeowner and that has not been expressly agreed upon by the homeowner and management in the written rental agreement or lease, shall be void and unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

798.25.5.

Any rule or regulation of a mobilehome park that (a) is unilaterally adopted by the management, (b) is implemented without the consent of the homeowners, and (c) by its terms purports to deny homeowners their right to a trial by jury or which would mandate binding arbitration of any dispute between the management and homeowners shall be void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 889, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

798.26.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the ownership or management of a park shall have no right of entry to a mobilehome or enclosed accessory structure without the prior written consent of the resident. The consent may be revoked in writing by the resident at any time. The ownership or management shall have a right of entry upon the land upon which a mobilehome is situated for maintenance of utilities, trees, and driveways, for maintenance of the premises in accordance with the rules and regulations of the park when the
 homeowner or resident fails to so maintain the premises, and protection of the mobilehome park at any reasonable time, but not in a manner or at a time that would interfere with the resident’s quiet enjoyment.

(b) The ownership or management of a park may enter a mobilehome or enclosed accessory structure without the prior written consent of the resident in case of an emergency or when the resident has abandoned the mobilehome or accessory structure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 115, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

798.27.

(a) The management shall give written notice to all homeowners and prospective homeowners concerning the following matters: (1) the nature of the zoning or use permit under which the mobilehome park operates. If the mobilehome park is operating pursuant to a permit subject to a renewal or expiration date, the relevant information and dates shall be included in the notice. (2) The duration of any lease of the mobilehome park, or any portion thereof, in which the management is a lessee. 

(b) If a change occurs concerning the zoning or use permit under which the
 park operates or a lease in which the management is a lessee, all homeowners shall be given written notice within 30 days of that change. Notification regarding the change of use of the park, or any portion thereof, shall be governed by subdivision (g) of Section 798.56. A prospective homeowner shall be notified prior to the inception of the tenancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 190, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

798.28.

The management of a mobilehome park shall disclose, in writing, within 10 business days, the name, business address, and business telephone number of the mobilehome park owner upon the receipt of a written request of a homeowner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 31, Sec. 1.   (AB 294)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

798.28.5.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the management may cause the removal, pursuant to Section 22658 of the Vehicle Code, of a vehicle other than a mobilehome that is parked in the park when there is displayed a sign at each entrance to the park as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 22658 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) (1) Management may not cause the removal of a vehicle from a homeowner’s or resident’s driveway or a homeowner’s or resident’s designated parking space except if management has first posted on the windshield of the vehicle a notice stating management’s intent to remove the vehicle in seven days and stating the specific park rule that the vehicle has violated
 that justifies its removal. After the expiration of seven days following the posting of the notice, management may remove a vehicle that remains in violation of a rule for which notice has been posted upon the vehicle. If a vehicle rule violation is corrected within seven days after the rule violation notice is posted on the vehicle, the vehicle may not be removed. If a vehicle upon which a rule violation notice has been posted is removed from the park by a homeowner or resident and subsequently is returned to the park still in violation of the rule stated in the notice, management is not required to post any additional notice on the vehicle, and the vehicle may be removed after the expiration of the seven-day period following the original notice posting.

(2) If a vehicle poses a significant danger to the health or safety of a park resident or guest, or if a homeowner or resident requests to have a vehicle removed from
 their driveway or designated parking space, the requirements of paragraph (1) do not apply, and management may remove the vehicle pursuant to Section 22658 of the Vehicle Code.

(c) (1) Management shall not cause the removal from a homeowner’s or resident’s driveway, a homeowner’s or resident’s designated parking space, or a space provided by management for parking vehicles, any vehicle used or required by the homeowner for work or employment or which advertises any trade or services on the vehicle.

(2) If any part of the vehicle extends into the park roadway or otherwise poses a significant danger to the health or safety of a park
 resident or guest, or if a homeowner or resident requests to have the vehicle removed from their driveway or designated parking space, paragraph (1) shall not apply, and management may remove the vehicle pursuant to Section 22658 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 79, Sec. 1.   (SB 1408)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

798.29.

The management shall post a Mobilehome Assistance Center sign provided by the Department of Housing and Community Development, as required by Section 18253.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 957, Sec. 1.   (SB 1078)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

798.29.6.

The management shall not prohibit a homeowner or resident from installing accommodations for the disabled on the home or the site, lot, or space on which the mobilehome is located, including, but not limited to, ramps or handrails on the outside of the home, as long as the installation of those facilities complies with code, as determined by an enforcement agency, and those facilities are installed pursuant to a permit, if required for the installation, issued by the enforcement agency. The management may require that the accommodations installed pursuant
 to this section be removed by the current homeowner at the time the mobilehome is removed from the park or pursuant to a written agreement between the current homeowner and the management prior to the completion of the resale of the mobilehome in place in the park. This section is not exclusive and shall not be construed to condition, affect, or supersede any other provision of law or regulation relating to accessibility or accommodations for the disabled.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 170, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Fees and Charges [798.30. - 798.39.5.]

798.30.

The management shall give a homeowner written notice of any increase in his or her rent at least 90 days before the date of the increase.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 448, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

798.30.5.

(a) (1) Subject to subdivision (b), management shall not, over the course of any 12-month period, increase the gross rental rate for a tenancy in a qualified mobilehome park more than 3 percent plus the percentage change in the cost of living, or 5 percent, whichever is lower, of the lowest gross rental rate charged for a tenancy at any time during the 12 months prior to the effective date of the increase.

(2) If the same homeowner maintains a tenancy over any 12-month period, the gross rental rate for the tenancy shall not be increased in more than two increments over that 12-month period, subject to the other restrictions of this subdivision governing gross rental rate increase.

(b) For a new tenancy in which no homeowner from the prior tenancy remains in lawful possession of the mobilehome space, management may establish the initial rental rate not subject to subdivision (a), unless the applicable local agency or jurisdiction has adopted an ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure that limits the allowable rental rate for a new tenancy, in which case that ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure shall apply. Subdivision (a) shall be applicable to subsequent increases after that initial rental rate has been established, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(c) A homeowner with a tenancy subject to this section shall not enter into a sublease that results in a total rent for the premises that exceeds the allowable rental rate authorized by subdivision (c) of Section 798.23.5. Nothing in this subdivision authorizes a homeowner to
 sublet or assign the homeowner’s interest where otherwise prohibited.

(d) Management shall provide notice of any increase in the rental rate, pursuant to subdivision (a), to each homeowner in accordance with Section 798.30.

(e) This section shall not apply to a tenancy for any of the following:

(1) A mobilehome space restricted by deed, regulatory restriction contained in an agreement with a government agency, or other recorded document as affordable housing for persons and families of very low, low, or moderate income, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code, or subject to an agreement that provides housing subsidies for affordable housing for persons and families of very low, low, or moderate income, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code or comparable federal statutes.

(2) A mobilehome space constructed and maintained in connection with any higher education institution within the state for use and occupancy by students in attendance at the institution.

(3) A mobilehome space subject to any ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure that restricts annual increases in the rental rate to an amount less than that provided in subdivision (a).

(4) A mobilehome space within a resident-owned mobilehome park, as defined in Section 799.

(f) (1) (A) This section shall apply to all rent increases occurring on or after February 18, 2021.

(B) This section shall become operative January 1, 2022.

(2) In the event that management has increased the rent by more than the amount permissible under subdivision (a) between February 18, 2021, and January 1, 2022, both of the following shall apply:

(A) The applicable rent on January 1, 2022, shall be the rent as of February 18, 2021, plus the maximum permissible increase under subdivision (a).

(B) Management shall not be liable to a homeowner for any corresponding rent overpayment.

(3) Management subject to subdivision (a) who increased the rental rate for a tenancy on or after February 18, 2021, but prior to January 1, 2022, by an amount less than the rental rate increase permitted by subdivision (a) shall be allowed to increase the rental rate twice, as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), within
 12 months of February 18, 2021, but in no event shall that rental rate increase exceed the maximum rental rate increase permitted by subdivision (a).

(g) Any waiver of the rights under this section shall be void as contrary to public policy.

(h) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for All Items” means the following:

(A) The Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for All Items (CPI-U) for the metropolitan area in which the property is located, as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics, which are as follows:

(i) The CPI-U for the Los Angeles-Long Beach-Anaheim metropolitan area covering the Counties of Los Angeles and
 Orange.

(ii) The CPI-U for the Riverside-San Bernardo-Ontario metropolitan area covering the Counties of Riverside and San Bernardino.

(iii) The CPI-U for the San Diego-Carlsbad metropolitan area covering the County of San Diego.

(iv) The CPI-U for the San Francisco-Oakland-Hayward metropolitan area covering the Counties of Alameda, Contra Costa, Marin, San Francisco, and San Mateo.

(v) Any successor metropolitan area index to any of the indexes listed in clauses (i) to (iv), inclusive.

(B) If the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics does not publish a CPI-U for the metropolitan area in which the property is located, the California Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for All
 Items as published by the Department of Industrial Relations.

(C) On or after January 1, 2022, if the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics publishes a CPI-U index for one or more metropolitan areas not listed in subparagraph (A), that CPI-U index shall apply in those areas with respect to rent increases that take effect on or after August 1 of the calendar year in which the 12-month change in that CPI-U, as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3), is first published.

(2) “Management” means the management, as defined in Section 798.2, of a qualified mobilehome park. 

(3) (A) “Percentage change in the cost of living” means the percentage change in the applicable Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for All Items, as described in paragraph (1) and computed pursuant to
 subparagraph (B) of this paragraph.

(B) (i) For rent increases that take effect before August 1 of any calendar year, the following shall apply:

(I) The percentage change shall be the percentage change in the amount published for April of the immediately preceding calendar year and April of the year before that.

(II) If there is not an amount published in April for the applicable geographic area, the percentage change shall be the percentage change in the amount published for March of the immediately preceding calendar year and March of the year before that.

(ii) For rent increases that take effect on or after August 1 of any calendar year, the following shall apply:

(I) The percentage change shall be the percentage change in the amount published for April of that calendar year and April of the immediately preceding calendar year.

(II) If there is not an amount published in April for the applicable geographic area, the percentage change shall be the percentage change in the amount published for March of that calendar year and March of the immediately preceding calendar year.

(iii) The percentage change shall be rounded to the nearest one-tenth of 1 percent.

(4) “Qualified mobilehome park” means a mobilehome park, as defined in Section 798.4, that is located within and governed by the jurisdictions of two or more incorporated cities. 

(i) (1) Nothing in this section affects the
 authority of a local government to adopt or maintain an ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure that establishes a maximum amount that may be charged for rent. However, if a local ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure allows for a rental rate increase greater than that provided in subdivision (a), this section shall apply.

(2) Nothing in this section alters the application of Sections 798.17, 798.45, or 798.49 to any ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure that establishes a maximum amount that may be charged for rent.

(3) This section is not intended to express any policy regarding the appropriate, allowable rental rate increase limitations when a local government or jurisdiction adopts an ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure regulating rent increases.

(j) This
 section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.   (AB 978)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

798.31.

A homeowner shall not be charged a fee for other than rent, utilities, and incidental reasonable charges for services actually rendered.

A homeowner shall not be charged a fee for obtaining a lease on a mobilehome lot for (1) a term of 12 months, or (2) a lesser period as the homeowner may request. A fee may be charged for a lease of more than one year if the fee is mutually agreed upon by both the homeowner and management.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 624, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

798.32.

(a) A homeowner shall not be charged a fee for services actually rendered which are not listed in the rental agreement unless he or she has been given written notice thereof by the management, at least 60 days before imposition of the charge.

(b) Those fees and charges specified in subdivision (a) shall be separately stated on any monthly or other periodic billing to the homeowner. If the fee or charge has a limited duration or is amortized for a specified period, the
 expiration date shall be stated on the initial notice and each subsequent billing to the homeowner while the fee or charge is billed to the homeowner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 338, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

798.33.

(a) No lease agreement entered into, modified, or renewed on or after January 1, 2001, shall prohibit a homeowner from keeping at least one pet within the park, subject to reasonable rules and regulations of the park. This section may not be construed to affect any other rights provided by law to a homeowner to keep a pet within the park.

(b) A homeowner shall not be charged a fee for keeping a pet in the park unless the management actually provides special facilities or
 services for pets. If special pet facilities are maintained by the management, the fee charged shall reasonably relate to the cost of maintenance of the facilities or services and the number of pets kept in the park.

(c) For purposes of this section, “pet” means any domesticated bird, cat, dog, aquatic animal kept within an aquarium, or other animal as agreed to between the management and the homeowner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 551, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

798.34.

(a) A homeowner shall not be charged a fee for a guest who does not stay with the homeowner for more than a total of 20 consecutive days or a total of 30 days in a calendar year. A person who is a guest, as described in this subdivision, shall not be required to register with the management.

(b) A homeowner who is living alone in the mobilehome and who wishes to share occupancy of their mobilehome with one other person, to be designated as the homeowner’s companion, may do so, and management shall not impose a fee for that person. For purposes of this subdivision, a homeowner may only designate one person at a time as a companion and shall not designate more than three companions in total during any calendar year, unless otherwise authorized by management.
 Management may refuse to allow a homeowner to share their mobilehome with a companion under this subdivision if park residency is subject to age restrictions and the proposed companion is unable or unwilling to provide documentation that the proposed companion meets those age restrictions.

(c) A homeowner may share their mobilehome with any person over 18 years of age if that person is providing live-in health care, live-in supportive care, or supervision to the homeowner. Management shall not charge a fee for the live-in caregiver but may require written confirmation from a licensed health care professional of the homeowner’s need for the care or supervision, if the need is not readily apparent or already known to management.

(d) A senior homeowner who resides in a mobilehome park that has implemented rules or regulations limiting residency based on age requirements for housing
 for older persons, pursuant to Section 798.76, may share their mobilehome with any person over 18 years of age if this person is a parent, sibling, child, or grandchild of the senior homeowner and requires live-in health care, live-in supportive care, or supervision. Management shall not charge a fee for this parent, sibling, child, or grandchild, but may require written confirmation from a licensed health care professional of the need for the care or supervision, if the need is not readily apparent or already known to management. As used in this section, “senior homeowner” means a homeowner who is 55 years of age or older.

(e) A guest, companion, live-in caregiver, or family member under the care of a senior homeowner, as they are described in this section, shall have no rights of tenancy in the park, and any agreement between the homeowner and the guest, companion, live-in caregiver, or family member under the care of a senior homeowner shall
 not change the terms and conditions of the rental agreement between management and the homeowner.

(f) A violation of the mobilehome park rules and regulations by a guest, companion, live-in caregiver, or family member under the care of a senior homeowner, as they are described in this section, shall be deemed a violation of the rules and regulations by the homeowner and subject to subdivision (d) of Section 798.56.

(g) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to create a duty on the part of management to manage, supervise, or provide care for a homeowner’s guest, companion, live-in caregiver, or family member under the care of a senior homeowner, during that person’s stay in the mobilehome park.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 504, Sec. 1.   (SB 274)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

798.35.

A homeowner shall not be charged a fee based on the number of members in his or her immediate family. As used in this section, the “immediate family” shall be limited to the homeowner, his or her spouse, their parents, their children, and their grandchildren under 18 years of age.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 24, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

798.36.

(a) A homeowner shall not be charged a fee for the enforcement of any of the rules and regulations of the park, except a reasonable fee may be charged by management for the maintenance or cleanup, as described in subdivision (b), of the land and premises upon which the mobilehome is situated in the event the homeowner fails to do so in accordance with the rules and regulations of the park after written notification to the homeowner and the failure of the homeowner to comply within 14 days. The written notice shall state the specific
 condition to be corrected and an estimate of the charges to be imposed by management if the services are performed by management or its agent.
